Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General

§§ 33-21-101 through 33-21-118.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 194, §§ 1 through 12, and Laws 1975, ch. 106, § 1, related to nurses.

§ 33-21-119.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Nurse Practice Act”.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Nurse” for “Nursing.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-120.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Advanced practice registered nurse (APRN)” means a nurse who:

May prescribe, administer, dispense or provide nonprescriptive and prescriptive medications including prepackaged medications, except schedule I drugs as defined in W.S.

35-7-1013

and

35-7-1014

;

Has responsibility for the direct care and management of patients and clients in relation to their human needs, disease states and therapeutic and technological interventions;

Has a doctorate or master’s degree in nursing, or an advanced practice registered nurse specialty or has completed an accredited advanced practice registered nurse educational program prior to January 1, 1999; and

Has completed an advanced program of study in a specialty area in an accredited nursing program, has taken and passed a national certification examination in the same area and has been granted licensure by the board to practice as an APRN.

“Alford plea” means a plea agreement where the defendant has pled guilty yet not admitted to all the facts that comprise the crime;

“Approval” is the process by which the board provides for evaluation and grants official recognition to nursing educational programs which meet established uniform and reasonable standards;

“Board” means the Wyoming state board of nursing;

“Certificate” means a document issued by the board permitting the performance by a nursing assistant/nurse aide of basic related nursing tasks and skills delegated by a licensed nurse and as allowed by statute and board rule;

“Competence” means the application of knowledge and the interpersonal, critical thinking, decision-making and psychomotor skills expected for the practice role within the context of public health, safety and welfare;

“Impaired” means the inability to practice nursing with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of one (1) or more of the following:

Lack of nursing competence;

Mental illness;

Physical illness including, but not limited to, deterioration through the aging process or loss of motor skill; or

Chemical or alcohol impairment.

“License” means a current document permitting the practice of nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse or licensed practical nurse;

“Nursing process” means the investigative approach to nursing practice utilizing a method of problem identification by means of:

Assessment: A systematic and continuous collection of objective and subjective data about the health status of individuals and groups derived from observations, health assessment including physical assessment, interviews, written records and reports;

Nursing Diagnosis: The identification of actual or potential responses to health needs or problems based on collecting, analyzing and comparing data with appropriate nursing standards to serve as the basis for providing nursing care or for which referral to appropriate medical or community resources is required;

Planning: Development of a plan of care which includes measurable goals derived from the nursing diagnosis and identified priorities to maintain comfort, support of human functions and responses, and an environment conducive to wellness;

Intervention: Actions in nursing practice which implement the plan of care to maximize health capabilities of individuals and groups;

Evaluation: The continuous appraisal of the effectiveness of goal attainment in the plan of care by means of reassessing health status, and if necessary, modifying nursing diagnosis, plan of care and interventions.

“Practice of practical nursing” means the performance of technical services and nursing procedures which require basic knowledge of the biological, physical, behavioral, psychological and sociological sciences. These skills and services are performed under the direction of a licensed physician or dentist, advanced practice registered nurse or registered professional nurse. Standardized procedures that lead to predictable outcomes are utilized in the observation and care of the ill, injured and infirm, in provision of care for the maintenance of health, in action directed toward safeguarding life and health, in administration of medications and treatments prescribed by any person authorized by state law to prescribe and in delegation to appropriate assistive personnel as provided by state law and board rules and regulations;

“Practice of professional nursing” means the performance of professional services requiring substantial knowledge of the biological, physical, behavioral, psychological and sociological sciences, and of nursing theory as the basis for applying the nursing process which consists of assessment, diagnosis, planning, intervention and evaluation. The nursing process is utilized in the promotion and maintenance of health, case finding and management of illness, injury or infirmity, restoration of optimum function and achievement of a dignified death. Nursing practice includes but is not limited to administration, teaching, counseling, supervision, delegation, evaluation of nursing practice and execution of the medical regimen. The therapeutic plan includes the administration of medications and treatments prescribed by any person authorized by state law to prescribe. Each registered professional nurse is accountable and responsible for the quality of nursing care rendered;

“Practice of a certified nursing assistant/nurse aide” means, regardless of title or care setting, the performance of nursing related tasks and services delegated by a licensed nurse. The nursing assistant/nurse aide shall complete a specified course of study approved by the board, meet minimum competency requirements and be certified by the board;

“This act” means W.S.

33-21-119

through

33-21-157

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 1991, ch. 152, § 1; 1993, ch. 8, § 1; 2001, ch. 121, § 1; 2003, ch. 116, § 2; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, adding (a)(ii), (a)(v) and (a)(vii); deleting former (a)(vi), which defined “medical act,” and former (a)(xi), which defined “functions of a nursing assistant/nurse aide”; redesignating paragraphs accordingly; and otherwise modifying requirements for the practice of nursing and providing regulations for the advanced practice of nurses pursuant to the Wyoming Nurse Practice Act as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 224.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i)(C) added “doctorate or” toward the beginning, in (a)(i)(D) substituted “licensure” for “recognition,” in (a)(viii) added “an advanced practiced registered nurse” and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-21-121.
Board of nursing; membership; appointment; qualifications; term of office; vacancies; removal.

The board of nursing shall consist of seven (7) members to be appointed by the governor. Five (5) members shall be registered nurses, one (1) member shall be a licensed practical nurse and one (1) member shall be a representative of the public. Membership shall be restricted to no more than one (1) person who is associated with a particular agency, educational institution, corporation or other enterprise or subsidiary at one time. Membership shall represent various geographical areas of Wyoming.

Each registered nurse member of the board shall be a resident of this state, licensed in good standing under the provisions of this act, currently engaged in the practice of nursing as a registered nurse and shall have had no less than five (5) years of experience as a registered nurse, at least three (3) of which immediately preceded appointment. Of the five (5) registered nurse members on the board, one (1) member shall have had at least two (2) years of experience in an administrative or teaching position in a nursing education program, one (1) member shall have had at least two (2) years of experience in administration in nursing service or public health nursing, one (1) member shall have at least two (2) years experience as an advanced practice registered nurse, and the remaining two (2) members shall be appointed from various areas of nursing.

The practical nurse member shall be a resident of this state, licensed in good standing under the provisions of this act, currently engaged in the practice of nursing as a licensed practical nurse, and shall have had no less than five (5) years of experience as a licensed practical nurse, at least three (3) of which immediately preceded appointment.

The representative of the public shall be a resident of this state who has attained the age of majority, is interested in consumer health concerns and shall not be nor ever have been licensed or employed as a provider of health care services or be enrolled or employed in any health related educational program.

Members of the board shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years.

The present members of the board holding office under the provisions of the Wyoming Nurse Practice Act as of July 1, 2005 shall serve as members for their respective terms.

No member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive full terms. The completion of an unexpired portion of a full term shall not constitute a full term for purposes of this subsection. Any board member initially appointed for less than a full term is eligible to serve for two (2) additional consecutive full terms.

An appointee to a full term on the board shall be appointed by the governor prior to the expiration of a term of the member being succeeded and shall become a member of the board on the first day following the expiration date of the preceding term. Appointees to unexpired portions of full terms shall become members of the board on the day following the appointment. Each term of office shall expire at 12:00 midnight on the last day of February for the term of the appointment.

A vacancy that occurs for any reason in the membership of the board shall be filled by the governor in the manner prescribed in the provisions of this act regarding appointments. A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the unexpired portion of the term.

The governor may remove any member from the board as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) specified a change in membership in the board so that five members are registered nurses, and one is a licensed practical nurse; in (b), made a related change and inserted the proviso that one member shall have at least two years experience as an advanced practice registered nurse; in (f) updated provisions, deleting obsolete ones; and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-122.
Board of nursing; powers and duties.

The responsibility for enforcement of the provisions of this act is vested in the board of nursing. The board shall have all of the duties, powers and authority specifically granted by and necessary to the enforcement of this act.

The board of nursing may make, adopt, amend, repeal and enforce reasonable rules and regulations necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this act.

Without limiting the foregoing, the board of nursing may do the following:

Develop by rules and regulations uniform and reasonable standards for nursing practice;

Appoint advisory committees to provide expertise in specific areas of education or practice under consideration by the board;

Publish advisory opinions relative to whether the nursing procedures, policies and other practices of any agency, facility, institution or other organization that employs individuals licensed or certified under this act complies with the standards of nursing practice as defined in this act and board rules and regulations. The board may submit comments, register complaints or file charges with the appropriate advisory, certifying or regulatory body governing the agency, facility, institution or organization that authorizes and condones violations of this act or board rules and regulations;

Report alleged violations of this act to the district attorney of the county where the violation occurred;

Examine, license, renew, relicense and reactivate the licenses of duly qualified individuals, may grant individuals a temporary permit to engage in the practice of professional and practical nursing in this state within the limits imposed in this act and may develop, by board rules and regulations, standards for continued competency of licensees continuing in or returning to practice;

Deny any applicant a license or temporary permit to practice professional or practical nursing, whether by examination, licensure, endorsement, renewal, relicensure or reactivation, if the applicant fails to meet the requirements of this act or board rules and regulations;

Conduct surveys and collect data related to licensure and educational enrollments and report to the public;

Conduct investigations, hearings and proceedings concerning alleged violations of this act and board rules and regulations and shall request criminal history background information on license or certificate applicants as authorized under W.S. 7-19-106(a)(viii);

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may issue administrative subpoenas for the testimony of any license, certificate or temporary permit holder or other witness and may issue administrative subpoenas for the production of evidence relating to any matter under investigation. The board may compel attendance of witnesses and administer oaths to those testifying at hearings;

Determine and administer appropriate disciplinary action against all individuals found guilty of violating this act and board rules and regulations. The board retains jurisdiction over the person issued a license, certificate or temporary permit pursuant to this act, regardless of whether the license, certificate or permit expired, lapsed or was relinquished during or after the alleged occurrence of conduct proscribed by this act;

Develop and enforce uniform and reasonable standards for nursing education programs as stated in board rules and regulations;

Approve nursing education programs that meet the prescribed standards of the board;

Deny or withdraw approval of nursing education programs that fail to meet the prescribed standards of the board;

Regulate by board rules and regulations the qualifications of advanced practice registered nurses;

Maintain records of proceedings as required by state law;

Conduct conferences, forums, studies and research on nursing practice and education;

Maintain nursing statistics for purposes of nursing manpower planning and nursing education;

Appoint and employ a registered nurse qualified by nursing experience and a minimum of a master’s degree in nursing to serve as executive director, approve additional staff positions as may be necessary in the opinion of the board to administer and enforce the provisions of this act and determine qualifications for such positions;

Participate in and pay membership fees to organizations that develop and regulate the national nursing licensure examinations and exclusively promote the improvement of the uniform and reasonable standards for the practice of nursing for protection of the public health, safety and welfare;

Submit an annual report to the governor, summarizing the board’s proceedings and activities;

Determine and collect reasonable fees not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) as established by board rules and regulations;

Receive and expend funds for the pursuit of the authorized objectives of the board of nursing. Funds shall be maintained in a separate account and periodic reports of the receipt and expenditure of funds shall be submitted to the governor;

Adopt a seal which shall be in the care of the executive director and which shall be affixed only in a manner as prescribed by the board; and

By board rule and regulation, regulate the qualifications, certification, recertification, examination and discipline of nursing assistants and nurse aides. For purposes of carrying out this paragraph, fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check pursuant to W.S.

7-19-201

shall be provided to the board.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the board shall not, by rule or otherwise, limit the right of licensed nurses to practice with other health professionals or in an association, partnership, corporation or other lawful entity, nor limit the right of licensed nurses to practice under the name “nursing clinic”, “nursing center” or other descriptive terms, provided the term is not misleading regarding the nature of services provided.

This act does not require the board of nursing to act upon violations of the provisions of the act whenever, in the board’s opinion, the public interest will be served adequately by a suitable written notice of warning to affected parties.

The board shall administer the provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact pursuant to W.S.

33-21-202

, including factoring the annual assessment required under the compact into its biennium budget.

The board shall administer the provisions of the advance practice registered nurse compact pursuant to W.S.

33-21-302

, including factoring the annual assessment required under the compact into its biennium budget.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 1993, ch. 8, § 1; 1997, ch. 20, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2010, ch. 29, § 1; 2016 ch. 10, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (c)(iv), redesignating paragraphs in (c) accordingly; in (c)(vi), inserted “endorsement”; in (c)(vii) inserted “and collect data related to”; in (c)(xviii) substituted “registered nurse qualified by nursing experience and a minimum of a master's degree in nursing” for “qualified registered nurse,” and added “and determine qualifications for such positions”; in (c)(xxi) increased the maximum fee from $200 to $500; in (c)(xxiv) deleted the former last sentence which limited the stringency of board rules and regulations to that of federal counterparts; and made stylistic changes throughout.

The 2010 amendment,

in (c)(ix), inserted the present first sentence, added “The board may,” and deleted “issue subpoenas” preceding “and administer oaths”; and added the last sentence in (c)(x).

Laws 2010, ch. 29 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first
2016 amendment, by ch. 10 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added (f).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 11 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added (f).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c)(iii), added “or certified” following “employs individuals licensed.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-123.
Executive director; appointment; assistant; powers and duties; salary and expenses.

An executive director shall be appointed by the board and is responsible for the performance of administrative responsibilities of the board and other duties as the board directs.

The executive director and assistant to the executive director shall be registered nurses, licensed in the state of Wyoming and qualified by nursing experience and a minimum of a master’s degree in nursing.

The executive director and assistant to the executive director may act on the board’s behalf during the period between board meetings in matters of licensure, examination, disciplinary and other administrative functions.

The executive director and the assistant to the executive director of the board of nursing shall receive an annual salary which shall be determined by the board in conjunction with the personnel department and which shall be competitive with salaries for positions requiring similar education and experience and shall receive reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses incurred in connection with the performance of official duties as provided for in state statutes.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b) substituted “nursing experience and a minimum of a master's degree in nursing” for “education and experience”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 33-21-124.
Board; officers; duties; terms.

The board of nursing shall elect from its registered nurse members a president and vice president. The president shall preside at board meetings and shall be responsible for the performance of all duties and functions of the board required or permitted by this act. In the absence of the president, the vice president shall assume these duties.

Additional offices shall be established and filled by the board at its discretion.

Officers elected by the board shall serve a term of one (1) year commencing with the day of their election and ending upon election of their successors and shall serve no more than three (3) consecutive full terms in each office to which they are elected.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-125.
Board; meetings; notice; quorum; board action; conflict of interest.

The board of nursing shall meet at least once every six (6) months to transact its business. One (1) meeting shall be designated as the annual meeting for the purpose of electing officers and board reorganization and planning. The board shall meet at additional times as it may determine. Additional meetings may be called by the president of the board or by two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the board. Board meetings and hearings shall be open to the public. In accordance with the law, the board may conduct part of the meeting in executive session, closed to the public.

Notice of all board meetings shall be given in the manner pursuant to board rules and regulations.

A majority of the board members including the president or vice president constitutes a quorum for the conduct of a board meeting. The act of the majority of members present at a meeting, which includes a quorum, shall be the act of the board of nursing.

The board members shall vote when present. When a conflict of interest exists, the board members shall abstain from voting.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “and one (1) licensed practical nurse” in (c).

§ 33-21-126.
Board; compensation

Each member of the board shall receive as salary the sum paid each day to legislators and shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii), incurred in the performance of their duties.

History:

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “shall be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for per diem and travel expenses.”

§ 33-21-127.
Qualifications for licensure or certification; application requirements.

An applicant for licensure or certification by examination to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant shall:

Submit a written application verified by oath as prescribed by the board;

Be a graduate of a state board approved nursing or nursing assistant education program recognized by the board which prepares the applicant for the level of licensure or certification being sought;

Pass a board approved national nursing licensure or certification examination;

Have committed no acts which are grounds for disciplinary action as set forth in W.S.

33-21-146

, or if the act has been committed, the board may, at its discretion and after investigation, determine that sufficient restitution has been made; and

Remit fees as specified by the board.

An applicant for licensure or certification by endorsement to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant shall:

Submit a written application verified by oath as prescribed by the board;

Be a graduate of a state board approved nursing or nursing assistant education program recognized by the board which prepares the applicant for the level of licensure or certification being sought;

Have committed no acts which are grounds for disciplinary action as set forth in W.S.

33-21-146

, or if the act has been committed, the board may, at its discretion and after investigation, determine that sufficient restitution has been made;

Remit fees as specified by the board; and either:

Submit proof of initial licensure or certification by an examination acceptable to the board, provided that when the applicant secured his or her initial license or certificate, the requirements for licensure or certification included the requirements then necessary for licensure or certification in this state and have submitted proof that the license or certificate has not been suspended, revoked or otherwise restricted for any reason; or

Be required to pass an examination or meet other requirements as specified by the board, if the applicant has not passed an examination acceptable to the board.

Each applicant who successfully meets the requirements of this section is entitled to licensure or certification as an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant, whichever is applicable.

In addition to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an applicant for licensure or certification under this act shall provide the board fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided under W.S.

7-19-201

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 20, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(iii) deleted the requirement that the examination be given by the board; added (b)(ii), redesignating the remaining paragraphs in (b) accordingly; in (b)(v) deleted “other than failure to renew or to obtain required continuing education credits” at the end; in (a)(iv) and (b)(iii) added provisions giving the board discretion to determine if sufficient restitution has been made; and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “either” at the end of the introductory language in (b)(iv); and redesignated former (b)(v) and (b)(vi) as (b)(iv)(A) and (b)(iv)(B).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a),(b),(c), and (d) substituted “licensure or certification” for “licensure” or variants throughout and substituted “an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse” for “a registered nurse” throughout; in (a) added “or certified nursing assistant,” in (a)(ii) added “or nursing assistant” and “the applicant”; in (b) added “or certified nursing assistant,” in (b)(ii)
added “or nursing assistant” and “the applicant;” and in (c) added “or certified nursing assistant.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

Conflicting Legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-21-128.
Examinations for licensure; reexamination.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 224, § 2.

The board may employ, contract and cooperate with any organization in the preparation, administration and grading of an appropriate national nursing licensure or nursing assistant certification examination.

The board shall by rules and regulations limit the number of reexaminations which may be taken by the applicant after the initial failure of a board approved national nursing licensure or nursing assistant certification examination.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (a), which required the board to administer a board-approved national nursing licensure examination, giving due publicity in advance; in (b) inserted “administration” after “preparation,” and deleted provisions which gave the board sole discretion and responsibility for determining successful completion of test and allowed the board to restrict access to questions in the case of use of a national examination.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b) and (c) added “or nursing assistant certification” following “national nursing licensure.”

§ 33-21-129.
Renewal of licenses or certificates.

Licenses or certificates issued under this act shall be renewed biennially according to a schedule established by board rules and regulations.

A renewal license or certificate shall be issued to an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant who demonstrates satisfactory completion of requirements established by the board and who remits the required fees established in the board rules and regulations.

Any license or certificate issued by the board shall expire if the licensee or certificate holder fails to renew the license or certificate as established in board rules and regulations, including the remittance of all fees.

Failure to renew the license or certificate by the expiration date shall result in forfeiture of the right to practice nursing or nurse assisting in this state.

For licensees who have prescriptive authority the board shall require three (3) hours of continuing education related to the responsible prescribing of controlled substances or treatment of substance abuse disorders every two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (c), deleted the former last sentence which allowed a 60-day period for renewal of a license after compliance with board rules and regulations; and in (d) inserted “by the expiration date.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “licenses or certificates” for “licenses” and variants throughout; in (b) added “an advanced practice registered nurse” preceding “registered nurse,” added “or certified nursing assistant” preceding “who demonstrates”; in (d) added “or nurse assisting”; and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (e).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-130.
Relicensure or recertification.

Licensees or certificate holders who have allowed their license or certificate to lapse by failure to renew as herein provided, may apply for relicensure or recertification according to board rules and regulations. Upon satisfaction of the requirements for relicensure or recertification, the board shall issue a renewal of license or certificate to practice nursing or nurse assisting.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “relicensure” for “licensure” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “license or certificate” for “license” and variants five times; and added “or nurse assisting” at the end.

§ 33-21-131.
Inactive status; reactivation or recertification.

Licensees or certificate holders who hold an active license or certificate to practice in this state, and who wish to discontinue the practice of professional or practical nursing or nurse assisting in this state, may request in writing that the board place their license or certificate on inactive status. A licensee or certificate holder on inactive status shall not be considered lapsed or expired. A biennial renewal fee shall be required to retain the inactive status. Licensees or certificate holders on inactive status may apply for reactivation pursuant to board rules and regulations.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the third sentence, which formerly read: “No renewal fee will be required of any licensee whose license has been placed on inactive status.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “or certificate holders” following “licensees” three times, substituted “license or certificate” for “license” twice, added “or nurse assisting” following “practical nursing” near the middle of the first sentence.

§ 33-21-132.
Temporary permit.

The board may issue a temporary permit to practice nursing or nurse assisting to an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant who is awaiting licensure or certification by endorsement and who is currently licensed or certified in good standing in another jurisdiction, territory or possession of the United States. The period for a temporary permit shall not exceed ninety (90) days, provided the applicant submits a written application for licensure or certification by endorsement in a form and substance satisfactory to the board. A temporary permit for such a request shall be issued only one (1) time.

The board may issue a temporary permit to practice nursing or nurse assisting to an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant who is not seeking licensure or certification by endorsement and who is currently licensed or certified in good standing in another jurisdiction, territory or possession of the United States. The period for a temporary permit shall not exceed ninety (90) days, provided the applicant submits a written application for licensure or certification by endorsement in a form and substance satisfactory to the board. A temporary permit for such a request shall be issued only one (1) time.

The board may issue a temporary permit to practice nursing or nurse assisting to a graduate of an approved nursing or nursing assistant education program, pending the results of the first board approved national nursing licensure or certification examination offered after graduation. A temporary permit shall not be issued to any applicant who has previously failed a board approved national nursing licensure or certification examination. The temporary permit shall be surrendered in event of failure of the licensure or certification examination. A new graduate holding a temporary permit shall practice only under the direction and supervision of a registered professional nurse. A temporary permit for such a request shall be issued only one (1) time.

The board may issue a temporary permit to graduates of foreign schools of nursing who have met the requirements for licensure by examination or endorsement pursuant to board rules and regulations. Applicants showing evidence of certification from a board approved national certifying organization for graduates of foreign nursing schools shall take the first available board approved national nursing licensure or certification examination for which they are eligible. A temporary permit for such a request shall be issued only one (1) time.

A temporary permit is nonrenewable.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (c), in the first sentence, deleted “who has not taken the first examination offered after the applicant's graduation or” following “any applicant”; in (d), rewrote the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, throughout (a), (b), (c), and (d), substituted “licensed or certified” for “licensed” and variants several times; in (a), (b), and (c) added “or nurse assisting” following “practice nursing” and variants four times; in (a) and (b) substituted “an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse” for “a registered nurse” twice and added “or certified nursing assistant” following “licensed practical nurse” twice; in (a) added the last sentence; in (c) added the last sentence; in (d) added “available” preceding “board approved national,” deleted “offered” following “examination,” added the last sentence; and made related changes.

§ 33-21-133.
Licensees and certificate holders to provide statistical information to board.

Each licensee and certificate holder shall provide reasonable information for statistics requested by the board to perform its duties in nursing manpower planning.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
added “and certificate holder” following “Each licensee.”